District of Columbia statutes.
26-551.21

Penalty for violation of final order.

A person who violates an outstanding and effective final order shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than $5,000, imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-308, § 121, 48 DCR 3244